Georgia statutes. TITLE 4 Animals
Article 2 Responsible Dog Ownership

Effective date. —

This article became effective July 1, 2012. See the editor’s note for applicability.

Cross references.

Liability of owner or keeper of vicious or dangerous animal for injuries caused by animal, § 51-2-7.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 4/HB 685, effective July 1, 2012, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this article and enacted the current article.
The former article consisted of Code Sections 4-8-20 through 4-8-30, relating to dangerous dog control, and was based on Ga. L. 1988, p. 824, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 159, §§ 1-5; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1552, § 15; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1238, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 6/HB 685, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the enactment of this article shall apply to proceedings for the classification and registration of dogs which are pending on July 1, 2012, as well as to such proceedings which arise on or after July 1, 2012.

4-8-20.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Responsible Dog Ownership Law.”

History.

Code 1981, §

4-8-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 4/HB 685.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 enactment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 180 (2012).

4-8-21.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Classified dog” means any dog that has been classified as either a dangerous dog or vicious dog pursuant to this article.

“Dangerous dog” means any dog that:

Causes a substantial puncture of a person’s skin by teeth without causing serious injury; provided, however, that a nip, scratch, or abrasion shall not be sufficient to classify a dog as dangerous under this subparagraph;

Aggressively attacks in a manner that causes a person to reasonably believe that the dog posed an imminent threat of serious injury to such person or another person although no such injury occurs; provided, however, that the acts of barking, growling, or showing of teeth by a dog shall not be sufficient to classify a dog as dangerous under this subparagraph; or

While off the owner’s property, kills a pet animal; provided, however, that this subparagraph shall not apply where the death of such pet animal is caused by a dog that is working or training as a hunting dog, herding dog, or predator control dog.

“Local government” means any county or municipality of this state.

“Owner” means any natural person or any legal entity, including, but not limited to, a corporation, partnership, firm, or trust owning, possessing, harboring, keeping, or having custody or control of a dog. In the case of a dog owned by a minor, the term “owner” includes the parents or person in loco parentis with custody of the minor.

“Serious injury” means any physical injury that creates a substantial risk of death; results in death, broken or dislocated bones, lacerations requiring multiple sutures, or disfiguring avulsions; requires plastic surgery or admission to a hospital; or results in protracted impairment of health, including transmission of an infection or contagious disease, or impairment of the function of any bodily organ.

“Vicious dog” means a dog that inflicts serious injury on a person or causes serious injury to a person resulting from reasonable attempts to escape from the dog’s attack.

No dog shall be classified as a dangerous dog or vicious dog for actions that occur while the dog is being used by a law enforcement or military officer to carry out the law enforcement or military officer’s official duties. No dog shall be classified as a dangerous dog or a vicious dog if the person injured by such dog was a person who, at the time, was committing a trespass, was abusing the dog, or was committing or attempting to commit an offense under Chapter 5 of Title 16.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-8-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 4/HB 685.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 enactment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 180 (2012).

4-8-22.
Jurisdiction; designation of dog control officer; consolidation of services.

A county’s jurisdiction for the enforcement of this article shall be the unincorporated area of the county and a municipality’s jurisdiction for such enforcement shall be the territory within the corporate limits of the municipality.

The governing authority of each local government shall designate one or more individuals as dog control officers to aid in the administration and enforcement of the provisions of this article. An individual carrying out the duties of dog control officer shall not be authorized to make arrests unless he or she is a law enforcement officer having the powers of arrest.

Any county or municipality or any combination of such local governments may enter into agreements with each other for the consolidation of dog control services under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-8-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 4/HB 685; Ga. L. 2014, p. 371, § 1/SB 290.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in subsection (b), substituted “one or more individuals as dog control officers” for “an individual as dog control officer” in the first sentence and, in the second sentence, substituted “An individual” for “A person” at the beginning and substituted “he or she” for “the person” in the middle. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 371, § 6/SB 290, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2014, and shall apply to all violations and confiscations which occur on or after that date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 enactment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 180 (2012).

4-8-23.
[Effective until July 1, 2023] Investigations by dog control officer; notice to owner; hearings; determinations by hearing authority; judicial review.

For purposes of this Code section, the term:

“Animal shelter” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 4-14-2.

“Authority” means an animal control board or local board of health, as determined by the governing authority of a local government.

“Mail” means to send by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to the recipient’s last known address.

Upon receiving a report of a dog believed to be subject to classification as a dangerous dog or vicious dog within a dog control officer’s jurisdiction, the dog control officer shall make such investigations as necessary to determine whether such dog is subject to classification as a dangerous dog or vicious dog.

When a dog control officer determines that a dog is subject to classification as a dangerous dog or vicious dog, the dog control officer shall mail a dated notice to the dog’s owner within 72 hours. Such notice shall include a summary of the dog control officer’s determination and shall state that the owner has a right to request a hearing from the authority on the dog control officer’s determination within seven days after the date shown on the notice; provided, however, that if an authority has not been established for the jurisdiction, the owner shall be informed of the right to request a hearing from the probate court for such jurisdiction where the dog was found or confiscated within seven days after the date shown on the notice. The notice shall provide a form for requesting the hearing and shall state that if a hearing is not requested within the allotted time, the dog control officer’s determination shall become effective for all purposes under this article. If an owner cannot be located within ten days of a dog control officer’s determination that a dog is subject to classification as a dangerous dog or vicious dog, such dog may be released to an animal shelter or humanely euthanized, as determined by the dog control officer.

When a hearing is requested by a dog owner in accordance with subsection (c) of this Code section, such hearing shall be scheduled within 30 days after the request is received; provided, however, that such hearing may be continued by the authority or probate court for good cause shown. At least ten days prior to the hearing, the authority or probate court conducting the hearing shall mail to the dog owner written notice of the date, time, and place of the hearing. At the hearing, the dog owner shall be given the opportunity to testify and present evidence and the authority or probate court conducting the hearing shall receive other evidence and testimony as may be reasonably necessary to sustain, modify, or overrule the dog control officer’s determination.

Within ten days after the hearing, the authority or probate court which conducted the hearing shall mail written notice to the dog owner of its determination on the matter. If such determination is that the dog is a dangerous dog or a vicious dog, the notice of classification shall specify the date upon which that determination shall be effective. If the determination is that the dog is to be euthanized pursuant to Code Section 4-8-26, the notice shall specify the date by which the euthanasia shall occur.

Judicial review of the authority’s final decision may be had in accordance with Code Section 15-9-30.9. Judicial review of a probate court’s final decision shall be in accordance with Code Section 5-3-2 and costs shall be paid as provided in Code Section 5-3-22.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-8-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 4/HB 685; Ga. L. 2014, p. 371, § 2/SB 290.

Delayed effective date.

Subsection (f), as set out above, is effective until July 1, 2023. For version of subsection (f) in effect on July 1, 2023, see the following version of this Code section.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in subsection (a), added paragraph (a)(1); redesignated former paragraphs (a)(1) and (a)(2) as present paragraphs (a)(2) and (a)(3), respectively; in subsection (c), in the second sentence, substituted “seven days” for “15 days” and added the proviso, deleted “also” preceding “provide” near the beginning of the third sentence and added the fourth sentence; inserted “or probate court” in three places in subsection (d) and near the beginning of subsection (e); and, in subsection (f), substituted “Code Section 15-9-30.9” for “Code Section 50-13-19” at the end of the first sentence and added the second sentence. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 371, § 6/SB 290, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2014, and shall apply to all violations and confiscations which occur on or after that date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 enactment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 180 (2012).

4-8-23.
[Effective July 1, 2023] Investigations by dog control officer; notice to owner; hearings; determinations by hearing authority; judicial review.

For purposes of this Code section, the term:

“Animal shelter” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 4-14-2.

“Authority” means an animal control board or local board of health, as determined by the governing authority of a local government.

“Mail” means to send by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to the recipient’s last known address.

Upon receiving a report of a dog believed to be subject to classification as a dangerous dog or vicious dog within a dog control officer’s jurisdiction, the dog control officer shall make such investigations as necessary to determine whether such dog is subject to classification as a dangerous dog or vicious dog.

When a dog control officer determines that a dog is subject to classification as a dangerous dog or vicious dog, the dog control officer shall mail a dated notice to the dog’s owner within 72 hours. Such notice shall include a summary of the dog control officer’s determination and shall state that the owner has a right to request a hearing from the authority on the dog control officer’s determination within seven days after the date shown on the notice; provided, however, that if an authority has not been established for the jurisdiction, the owner shall be informed of the right to request a hearing from the probate court for such jurisdiction where the dog was found or confiscated within seven days after the date shown on the notice. The notice shall provide a form for requesting the hearing and shall state that if a hearing is not requested within the allotted time, the dog control officer’s determination shall become effective for all purposes under this article. If an owner cannot be located within ten days of a dog control officer’s determination that a dog is subject to classification as a dangerous dog or vicious dog, such dog may be released to an animal shelter or humanely euthanized, as determined by the dog control officer.

When a hearing is requested by a dog owner in accordance with subsection (c) of this Code section, such hearing shall be scheduled within 30 days after the request is received; provided, however, that such hearing may be continued by the authority or probate court for good cause shown. At least ten days prior to the hearing, the authority or probate court conducting the hearing shall mail to the dog owner written notice of the date, time, and place of the hearing. At the hearing, the dog owner shall be given the opportunity to testify and present evidence and the authority or probate court conducting the hearing shall receive other evidence and testimony as may be reasonably necessary to sustain, modify, or overrule the dog control officer’s determination.

Within ten days after the hearing, the authority or probate court which conducted the hearing shall mail written notice to the dog owner of its determination on the matter. If such determination is that the dog is a dangerous dog or a vicious dog, the notice of classification shall specify the date upon which that determination shall be effective. If the determination is that the dog is to be euthanized pursuant to Code Section 4-8-26, the notice shall specify the date by which the euthanasia shall occur.

Judicial review of the authority’s final decision may be had in accordance with Code Section 15-9-30.9. Judicial review of a probate court’s final decision shall be in accordance with Code Section 5-3-4 and costs shall be paid as provided in Code Section 5-3-16.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-8-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 4/HB 685; Ga. L. 2014, p. 371, § 2/SB 290; Ga. L. 2022, p. 767, § 2-2/HB 916.

Delayed effective date.

Subsection (f), as set out above, becomes effective July 1, 2023. For version of subsection (f) in effect until July 1, 2023, see the preceding version of this Code section.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2023, substituted “Code Section 5-3-4” for “Code Section 5-3-2” and “Code Section 5-3-16” for “Code Section 5-3-22” in subsection (f). For applicability, see Editor’s notes.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 767, § 3-1/HB 916, not codified by the General Assembly, makes this Code section applicable to petitions for review filed in superior or state court on or after July 1, 2023.

4-8-24.
Impoundment.

A law enforcement officer or dog control officer shall immediately impound a dog if the officer believes the dog poses a threat to the public safety.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-8-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 4/HB 685.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 enactment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 180 (2012).

4-8-25.
Court ordered euthanasia.

The judge of any superior court of competent jurisdiction within this state may order the euthanasia of a dog if the court finds, after notice and opportunity for hearing as provided by Code Section 4-8-23, that the dog has seriously injured a human or presents a danger to humans not suitable for control under this article and:

The owner or custodian of the dog has been convicted of a violation of any state criminal law and the crime was related to such dog; or

Any local governmental authority has filed with the court a civil action requesting the euthanasia of the dog.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-8-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 4/HB 685.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 amendment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 180 (2012).

4-8-26.
Euthanasia for dogs with repeat offenses.

A dog that is found, after notice and opportunity for hearing as provided by Code Section 4-8-23, to have caused a serious injury to a human on more than one occasion shall be euthanized; provided, however, that no injury occurring before July 1, 2012, shall count for purposes of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-8-26

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 4/HB 685.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2012, “this Code section” was substituted for “this subsection” at the end of the Code section.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 amendment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 180 (2012).

4-8-27.
Certificates of registration; requirements for issuance of certificate; individuals excluded from receiving registration; limitation of ownership; annual renewal.

It shall be unlawful for an owner to have or possess within this state a classified dog without a certificate of registration issued in accordance with the provisions of this Code section. Certificates of registration shall be nontransferable and shall only be issued to a person 18 years of age or older. No more than one certificate of registration shall be issued per domicile.

Unless otherwise specified by this Code section, a certificate of registration for a dangerous dog shall be issued if the dog control officer determines that the following requirements have been met:

The owner has maintained an enclosure designed to securely confine the dangerous dog on the owner’s property, indoors, or in a securely locked and enclosed pen, fence, or structure suitable to prevent the dangerous dog from leaving such property; and

Clearly visible warning signs have been posted at all entrances to the premises where the dog resides.

Except as provided in subsections (e) and (f) of this Code section, a certificate of registration for a vicious dog shall be issued if the dog control officer determines that the following requirements have been met:

The owner has maintained an enclosure designed to securely confine the vicious dog on the owner’s property, indoors, or in a securely locked and enclosed pen, fence, or structure suitable to prevent the vicious dog from leaving such property;

Clearly visible warning signs have been posted at all entrances to the premises where the dog resides;

A microchip containing an identification number and capable of being scanned has been injected under the skin between the shoulder blades of the dog; and

The owner maintains and can provide proof of general or specific liability insurance in the amount of at least $50,000.00 issued by an insurer authorized to transact business in this state insuring the owner of the vicious dog against liability for any bodily injury or property damage caused by the dog.

No certificate of registration shall be issued to any person who has been convicted of two or more violations of this article.

No person shall be the owner of more than one vicious dog.

No certificate of registration for a vicious dog shall be issued to any person who has been convicted of:

A serious violent felony as defined in Code Section 17-10-6.1;

The felony of dogfighting as provided for in Code Section 16-12-37 or the felony of aggravated cruelty to animals as provided for in Code Section 16-12-4; or

A felony involving trafficking in cocaine, illegal drugs, marijuana, methamphetamine, or ecstasy as provided for in Code Sections 16-13-31 and 16-13-31.1

from the time of conviction until two years after completion of his or her sentence, nor to any person residing with such person.

Certificates of registration shall be renewed on an annual basis. At the time of renewal of a certificate of registration for a vicious dog, a dog control officer shall verify that the owner is continuing to comply with provisions of this article. Failure to renew a certificate of registration within ten days of the renewal date or initial classification date shall constitute a violation of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-8-27

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 4/HB 685.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2012, a period was substituted for a semicolon at the end of paragraph (b)(2), and paragraphs (f)(A) through (f)(C) were redesignated as paragraphs (f)(1) through (f)(3), respectively.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 enactment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 180 (2012).

4-8-28.
Notifications by owner; change in ownership of dog; changes in residence.

The owner of a classified dog shall notify the dog control officer within 24 hours if the dog is on the loose or has attacked a human and shall notify the dog control officer within 24 hours if the dog has died or has been euthanized.

A vicious dog shall not be transferred, sold, or donated to any other person unless it is relinquished to a governmental facility or veterinarian to be euthanized.

The owner of a classified dog who moves from one jurisdiction to another within the State of Georgia shall register the classified dog in the new jurisdiction within ten days of becoming a resident and notify the dog control officer of the jurisdiction from which he or she moved. The owner of a similarly classified dog who moves into this state shall register the dog as required in Code Section 4-8-27 within 30 days of becoming a resident.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-8-28

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 4/HB 685.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 enactment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 180 (2012).

4-8-29.
Limitations on dog’s presence off of owner’s premises; penalty for violation; defense.

It shall be unlawful for an owner of a dangerous dog to permit the dog to be off the owner’s property unless:

The dog is restrained by a leash not to exceed six feet in length and is under the immediate physical control of a person capable of preventing the dog from engaging any other human or animal when necessary;

The dog is contained in a closed and locked cage or crate; or

The dog is working or training as a hunting dog, herding dog, or predator control dog.

It shall be unlawful for an owner of a vicious dog to permit the dog to be:

Outside an enclosure designed to securely confine the vicious dog while on the owner’s property or outside a securely locked and enclosed pen, fence, or structure suitable to prevent the vicious dog from leaving such property unless:

The dog is muzzled and restrained by a leash not to exceed six feet in length and is under the immediate physical control of a person capable of preventing the dog from engaging any other human or animal when necessary; or

The dog is contained in a closed and locked cage or crate; or

Unattended with minors.

A person who violates subsection (b) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of high and aggravated nature.

An owner with a previous conviction for a violation of this article whose classified dog causes serious injury to a human being under circumstances constituting another violation of this article shall be guilty of a felony and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one nor more than ten years, a fine of not less than $5,000.00 nor more than $10,000.00, or both. In addition, the classified dog shall be euthanized at the cost of the owner.

Any irregularity in classification proceedings shall not be a defense to any prosecution under this article so long as the owner of the dog received actual notice of the classification and did not pursue a civil remedy for the correction of the irregularity.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-8-29

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 4/HB 685.

Cross references.

Liability of owner or keeper of vicious or dangerous animal for injuries caused by animal, § 51-2-7.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2012, “or” was deleted at the end of paragraph (a)(1) and “; or” was substituted for a period at the end of paragraph (a)(2).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 enactment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 180 (2012).

4-8-30.
Confiscation by dog control officer; payment of costs for recovery; euthanasia.

A dangerous dog or vicious dog shall be immediately confiscated by any dog control officer or by a law enforcement officer in the case of any violation of this article. A refusal to surrender a dog subject to confiscation shall be a violation of this article.

The owner of any dog that has been confiscated pursuant to this article may recover such dog upon payment of all reasonable confiscation and housing costs and proof of compliance with the provisions of this article, unless such confiscation is deemed to be in error by a dog control officer, an authority, as defined in Code Section 4-8-23, or a probate court. All fines and all charges for services performed by a law enforcement or dog control officer shall be paid prior to owner recovery of the dog. Criminal prosecution shall not be stayed due to owner recovery or euthanasia of the dog.

In the event the owner has not complied with the provisions of this article within 14 days of the date the dog was confiscated, such dog shall be released to an animal shelter, as such term is defined in Code Section 4-14-2, or euthanized in an expeditious and humane manner. The owner may be required to pay the costs of housing and euthanasia.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-8-30

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 4/HB 685; Ga. L. 2014, p. 371, § 3/SB 290.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, inserted “dog” near the beginning of the first sentence of subsection (a); in subsection (b), in the first sentence, inserted “all” near the middle and added “, unless such confiscation is deemed to be in error by a dog control officer, an authority, as defined in Code Section 4-8-23, or a probate court” at the end; and, in subsection (c), substituted “14 days” for “20 days” near the middle and substituted “shall be released to an animal shelter, as such term is defined in Code Section 4-14-2, or euthanized in an expeditious and humane manner. The owner” for “shall be destroyed in an expeditious and humane manner and the owner” near the end. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 371, § 6/SB 290, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2014, and shall apply to all violations and confiscations which occur on or after that date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 enactment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 180 (2012).

For annual survey on local government law, see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 189 (2019).

4-8-31.
Governmental liability for enforcement.

Under no circumstances shall a local government or any employee or official of a local government be held liable for any damages to any person who suffers an injury inflicted by a dog as a result of a failure to enforce the provisions of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-8-31

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 4/HB 685.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 enactment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 180 (2012).

4-8-32.
Penalty for violation.

Except as otherwise specified in this article, any person who violates any provision of this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-8-32

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 4/HB 685.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 enactment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 180 (2012).

4-8-33.
Application and compliance.

Any dog classified prior to July 1, 2012, as a potentially dangerous dog in this state shall on and after that date be classified as a dangerous dog under this article.

Any dog classified prior to July 1, 2012, as a dangerous dog or vicious dog in this state shall on and after that date be classified as a vicious dog under this article.

The owner of any dog referred to in subsection (a) of this Code section shall come into compliance with all current provisions of this article by January 1, 2013.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-8-33

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1290, § 4/HB 685.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 enactment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 180 (2012).